Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.412

Center for research and training in intellectual and developmental disabilities—Administration.

The center shall be administered by the board of regents of the University of Washington.

[ 1982 c 163 s 4; 1973 c 62 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.412. Prior: 1963 c 193 s 2. Formerly RCW 28.77.432.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1982 c 163: See notes following RCW 2.10.052.

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.